District of Columbia statutes.
34-608

Authority of Commission to rescind its order after appeal is filed.

The Commission may at any time, rescind, alter, modify, or amend its order. If, after appeal is filed, the Commission shall rescind the order or decision appealed from, the appeal shall be dismissed; if it shall alter, modify, or amend the same, such altered, modified, or amended order or decision shall take the place of the original order and the Court shall proceed thereon as though the late order had been made by the Commission in the first instance.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 989, ch. 150, § 8, par. 69
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 884, ch. 742, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-908.
1973 Ed., § 43-709.

Editor's Notes

Former § 43-910 1981 Ed., 49 Stat. 885, ch. 742, § 4, provided that if any provision this section or the application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity of the remainder of said sections and of the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.